Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2621
Fees; laboratory tests and services; credited to Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

All fees collected for laboratory tests and services pursuant to sections 71-2618 to 71-2620 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund, which shall be used to partially defray the costs of labor, operations, supplies, and materials in the operations of the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Environmental Laboratory.

Laws 1973, LB 583, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 638;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 554;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 22;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 70.